District of Columbia statutes.
2-1573

Eligibility.

(a)

First time participants in the program shall maintain an acceptable level of school attendance during the preceding academic year in order participate. The superintendent of schools or his designee shall certify that each prospective participant has maintained an acceptable level of school attendance during the preceding academic year.

(b)

Eligible District youth participating twice or more in the program shall maintain an acceptable level of school attendance and at least a 2.0 cumulative grade point average during the preceding academic year. The superintendent of schools or his designee shall certify that each of these participants has maintained an acceptable level of school attendance and at least a 2.0 cumulative grade point average during the preceding academic year.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-32, § 4, 52 DCR 7475

History